Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.44, is amended to read: 14.44 DETERMINATION OF VALIDITY OF RULE. new text begin (a) new text end The validity of any rule may be determined upon the petition for a declaratory judgment thereon, addressed to the court of appeals, when it appears that the rule, or its threatened application, interferes with or impairs, or threatens to interfere with or impair the legal rights or privileges of the petitioner. The agency shall be made a party to the proceeding. The declaratory judgment may be rendered whether or not the petitioner has first requested the agency to pass upon the validity of the rule in question, and whether or not the agency has commenced an action against the petitioner to enforce the rule. new text begin (b) The commissioner or head of an agency that adopted a rule subject to petition under this section must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the agency or the subject matter of the rule within 30 days of the filing of a petition. The report must identify the rule subject to the petition and include a copy of the petition. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.45, is amended to read: 14.45 RULE DECLARED INVALID. new text begin (a) new text end In proceedings under section 14.44, the court shall declare the rule invalid if it finds that it violates constitutional provisions or exceeds the statutory authority of the agency or was adopted without compliance with statutory rulemaking procedures. Any party to proceedings under section 14.44, including the agency, may appeal an adverse decision of the court of appeals to the supreme court as in other civil cases. new text begin (b) The commissioner or head of an agency that adopted a rule declared invalid under this section must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the agency or the subject matter of the rule. The report must be made within 30 days of the decision of the court. The report must identify the rule declared invalid and provide a copy of the court's decision. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.63, is amended to read: 14.63 APPLICATION. new text begin (a) new text end Any person aggrieved by a final decision in a contested case is entitled to judicial review of the decision under the provisions of sections 14.63 to 14.68, but nothing in sections 14.63 to 14.68 shall be deemed to prevent resort to other means of review, redress, relief, or trial de novo provided by law. A petition for a writ of certiorari by an aggrieved person for judicial review under sections 14.63 to 14.68 must be filed with the court of appeals and served on all parties to the contested case not more than 30 days after the party receives the final decision and order of the agency. Sections 572B.01 to 572B.31 govern judicial review of arbitration awards entered under section 14.57. new text begin (b) The commissioner or head of an agency that made a final decision in a contested case for which a petition for a writ of certiorari is filed under this section must provide a copy of the writ of certiorari to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the agency or the subject of the rule not more than 30 days after the writ is filed with the court. The commissioner or head of the agency that made a final decision in a contested case for which a petition for a writ of certiorari is filed under this section must provide the court's decision on the petition for a writ of certiorari within 30 days of the court issuing its decision. new text end